Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB196.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2610YC (1) 91 jm/md H.F. _____ Section 1. Section 29C.9, subsection 4, Code 2025, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 4. For the purposes of this chapter , a commission is a 3 municipality as defined in section 670.1 and a municipality as 4 defined in section 24.2 . 5 Sec. 2. Section 29C.17, subsection 6, Code 2025, is amended 6 to read as follows: 7 6. Subject to As a certifying board under chapter 24 , the 8 commission shall adopt, certify, and provide a budget, on 9 or before February 28 of each year, to the funding entities 10 determined pursuant to subsection 2 . The form of the budget 11 shall be as prescribed by the department of management. Any 12 portion of a tax levied by a county or city to support the local 13 emergency management agency shall be identified separately on 14 tax statements issued by the county treasurer. 15 Sec. 3. APPLICABILITY. This Act applies to budgets for 16 property taxes due and payable in fiscal years beginning on or 17 after July 1, 2026. 18